fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Oleskelu ulkona > Ulkorakennukset: Katokset ja huvimajat; Katosten ja huvimajojen lisätarvikkeet; Puutarhakaaret, ristikot, majat ja pergolat; Puutarhasillat; Vajat, autotallit ja autokatokset
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Живот на открито > Външни конструкции: Навеси и беседки; Аксесоари за навеси и беседки; Градински арки, решетки, декоративни стойки за увивни растения и перголи; Градински мостове; Покривни съоръжения, гаражи и навеси за автомобили
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 戶外生活 > 戶外建物: 遮蓬; 戶外棚架/涼亭配件; 花園拱門/爬藤架/遮陽棚; 花園小橋; 貨棚和車庫
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Vida ao ar livre > Estruturas para exterior: Tendas e gazebos; Acessórios para tendas e gazebos; Arcos, treliças, arcos trabalhados e pérgolas para jardim; Pontes para jardim; Abrigos, garagens e abrigos para automóvel
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 户外生活用品 > 户外建筑: 遮蓬/凉亭; 遮篷/凉棚配件; 花园拱门、藤架、凉亭/棚架; 花园观赏桥; 棚屋/车库/车棚
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Outdoor Living > Outdoor Structures: Canopies & Gazebos; Canopy & Gazebo Accessories; Garden Arches, Trellises, Arbors & Pergolas; Garden Bridges; Sheds, Garages & Carports
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > 屋外用家具・エクステリア > エクステリア: キャノピー・ガゼボ; キャノピー・ガゼボ関連用品; 庭用アーチ・棚; 庭用橋; 小屋・物置
th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > ชีวิตกลางแจ้ง > สิ่งก่อสร้างกลางแจ้ง: คาโนปีและกาซีโบ; อุปกรณ์กระโจมและกาเซโบ; โครงสร้างรูปโค้ง โครงไม้ระแนง ซุ้มไม้ และซุ้มไม้เลื้อยสำหรับสวน; สะพานในสวน; เพิง โรงรถ และคาร์พอร์ท
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Gyvenimas lauke > Lauko konstrukcijos: Stoginės ir pavėsinės; Stoginių ir pavėsinių priedai; Sodo arkos, treliažai, grotelės ir pergolos; Sodo tiltai; Pašiūrės, garažai ir automobilių stoginės
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Udendørsliv > Udendørskonstruktioner: Baldakiner og lysthuse; Baldakiner og lysthuse – tilbehør; Havebuer, espalierer og løvgange; Havebroer; Skure, garager og carporte
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Utomhusliv > Utomhusbyggnader: Tält och lusthus; Tillbehör till tält och lusthus; Valvbågar, spaljéer, bersåer och pergolor; Trädgårdsbroar; Skjul, garage och carports
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Отдых на открытом воздухе > Уличные конструкции: Навесы и беседки; Аксессуары для навесов и беседок; Садовые арки, шпалеры и перголы; Садовые мостики; Сараи, гаражи и навесы для автомобилей
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Artículos de exterior > Estructuras de exteriores: Pabellones y cenadores; Accesorios para pabellones y cenadores; Pérgolas, arcos y enrejados de jardín; Puentes de jardín; Cobertizos, garajes y almacenes
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Buitenleven > Buitengebouwen: Luifels en tuinhuisjes; Accessoires voor luifels en prieeltjes; Tuinbogen, traliewerk, prieeltjes en pergola's; Tuinbruggen; Schuren, garages en carports
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Espaços residenciais externos > Estruturas externas: Capotas e toldos; Acessórios para dosséis e gazebos; Arcos, treliças, caramanchões e pérgolas de jardim; Pontes para jardins; Galpões, garagens e depósitos
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Bivanje na prostem > Zunanje konstrukcije: Nadstreški in vrtni paviljoni; Dodatki za nadstreške in vrtne paviljone; Vrtni oboki, oporne mreže, loki in pergole; Mostovi za vrt; Lope, garaže in nadstreški za avtomobile
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kültéri élet > Kültéri szerkezetek: Előtetők és pavilonok; Előtető- és pavilonkiegészítők; Kerti boltívek, rácsok, lugasok és pergolák; Kerti hidak; Istállók, garázsok és autóbeállók
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Vita all'aperto > Strutture da esterno: Baldacchini e gazebi; Accessori per baldacchini e gazebo; Archi, tralicci, pergole e pergolati da giardino; Ponti da giardino; Rimesse, tettoie e capanni
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 야외활동 용품 > 야외 구조물: 캐노피/정자; 캐노피/차광막 부대용품; 정원 아치/격자 구조물/정자/퍼걸러; 정원 다리; 창고/차고/간이 차고
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Akcesoria ogrodowe > Architektura ogrodowa: Zadaszenia i altany; Akcesoria do altan i tarasów; Pergole, kratki, altanki; Mostki ogrodowe; Składziki, garaże i wiaty
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Leve ute > Utendørsbygg: Baldakiner og lysthus; Tilbehør til baldakiner og lysthus; Hagebuer, espalierer og pergolaer; Hagebroer; Skur, garasjer og carporter
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Boravak na otvorenom > Vanjske konstrukcije: Nadstrešnice i sjenice; Pribor za nadstrešnice i sjenice; Vrtni lukovi, rešetke, rešetkasti lukovi i pergole; Vrtni mostovi; Šupe, garaže i nadstrešnice za automobile
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Υπαίθρια διαβίωση > Εξωτερικές κατασκευές: Στέγαστρα & κιόσκια; Αξεσουάρ για στέγαστρα & κιόσκια; Τόξα, δικτυώματα, άξονες & πέργολες κήπου; Γέφυρες κήπου; Υπόστεγα, γκαράζ & στέγαστρα
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Garten & Balkon > Gartenhäuschen & Gartenbauten: Pavillons & Gartenlauben; Pavillon-Zubehör; Bögen, Gitter, Laubengänge & Pergolen; Gartenbrücken; Schuppen, Garagen & Carports
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Exterior > Structuri de exterior: Copertine și foișoare; Accesorii pentru copertine și foișoare; Bolte, spaliere, suporturi pentru plante și pergole; Poduri pentru grădini; Șoproane, garaje și parcări acoperite pentru mașini
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Bydlení na zahradě > Zahradní architektura: Markýzy a altány; Přístřešky a altány – příslušenství; Zahradní oblouky, paravany, sedačky a pergoly; Zahradní mostky; Boudy, garáže a přístřešky pro auta
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Cuộc sống ngoài trời > Kết cấu ngoài trời: Mái che canopy và vọng lâu; Phụ kiện nhà/ lều bạt; Vòm vườn, giàn mắt cáo, trục gá và dàn cây dây leo; Cầu dùng trong sân vườn; Kho, ga ra & nhà để xe
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Ev Dışında Yaşam > Dış Mekan Yapıları: Gölgelikler ve Kameriyeler; Çardak ve Kamelya Aksesuarları; Bahçe Köprü Gözü; Bahçe Köprüsü; Kulübeler, Garajlar ve Sundurmalar
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Vie en extérieur > Structures extérieures: Auvents et abris; Accessoires pour auvents et abris; Arches, treillages, tonnelles et pergolas de jardin; Ponts de jardin; Cabanes, garages et auvents pour voitures
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Terasa > Vonkajšie konštrukcie: Prístrešky a altánky; Príslušenstvo pre prístrešky a altánky; Záhradné oblúky, treláže, altány a pergoly; Záhradné mostíky; Prístrešky, garáže a prístrešky pre autá